Utah statutes.
30-1-5.   Marriage solemnization -- Before unauthorized person -- Validity.
(1)  A marriage solemnized before a person professing to have authority to
perform marriages shall not be invalidated for lack of authority, if
consummated in the belief of the parties or either of them that he had
authority and that they have been lawfully married.
(2)  This section may not be construed to validate a marriage that is
prohibited or void under Section 30-1-2.
